test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VLONG_INDEP_boodawe_gt-norm.yaml
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemindigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niboodaweminbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niboodaweminbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawemingobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemingobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niboodawemwdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemwdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niboodawemwbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawemwbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawemwgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemwgobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: niboodawewdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawewdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: niboodawewbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawewbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawewgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawewgobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: niboodawemdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: niboodawembanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawembanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawemgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawemgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giboodawemindigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemindigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giboodaweminbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giboodaweminbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawemingobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemingobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giboodawemwdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemwdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giboodawemwbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawemwbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawemwgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemwgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: giboodawewdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawewdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: giboodawewbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawewbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawewgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawewgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: giboodawemdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: giboodawembanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawembanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawemgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawemgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimindigan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimindigag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: boodawesiiminbanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: boodawesiiminbanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimingobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimingobanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimwdigan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimwdigag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: boodawesiimwbanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: boodawesiimwbanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimwgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimwgobanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: boodawesiiwdigan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiiwdigag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: boodawesiiwbanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: boodawesiiwbanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawesiiwgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiiwgobanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimdigan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimdigag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: boodawesiimbanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: boodawesiimbanag
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: boodawesiimgobanan
     boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: boodawesiimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimindigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimindigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: niboodawesiiminbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawesiiminbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimingobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimingobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimwdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimwdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: niboodawesiimwbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawesiimwbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimwgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimwgobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiiwdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiiwdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: niboodawesiiwbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawesiiwbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiiwgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiiwgobanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimdigan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimdigag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: niboodawesiimbanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: niboodawesiimbanag
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: niboodawesiimgobanan
     1+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: niboodawesiimgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimindigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimindigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: giboodawesiiminbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawesiiminbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimingobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimingobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimwdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimwdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: giboodawesiimwbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawesiimwbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimwgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimwgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiiwdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiiwdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: giboodawesiiwbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawesiiwbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiiwgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiiwgobanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimdigan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimdigag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: giboodawesiimbanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: giboodawesiimbanag
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: giboodawesiimgobanan
     2+boodawe+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: giboodawesiimgobanag
     
